Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB668.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 218A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, ivermectin approved for human use may be
sold or purchased without a prescription or consultation with a practitioner as defined
in KRS 218A.010.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:59 PM Jacketed